District of Columbia statutes.
4-217.11

Condition of eligibility — Protective or vendor payments.

If the relative with whom the child is living is found to be ineligible for assistance because of failure to comply with conditions of §§ 4-217.08 and 4-217.09, any aid for which such child is eligible (determined without regard to the needs of the ineligible relative) shall be provided in the form of protective or vendor payments.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1711, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-217.11.